Wisconsin, session 2025, SB816.
do enact as follows:SB816,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table SB816,27Section 2. 20.370 (4) (kt) of the statutes is created to read:SB816,2,11820.370 (4) (kt) Deerskin River dredging grant. Biennially, from the 9environmental fund, from the moneys received by the department for 10environmental management purposes, the amounts in the schedule to provide a 11grant to the town of Washington in Vilas County for dredging the Deerskin River.SB816,312Section 3. 30.2024 of the statutes is created to read:SB816,2,181330.2024 Deerskin River dredging grant. (1) From the appropriation 14under s. 20.370 (4) (kt), the department shall award a grant of $1,750,000 to the 15town of Washington in Vilas County for a project to dredge the Deerskin River. The 16town of Washington may use the amounts awarded for the actual costs of permits, 17testing, dredging, and transportation of removed sediment if the costs are directly 18related to the dredging of the Deerskin River.SB816,2,2119(2) If the town of Washington does not complete the project under sub. (1) by 20December 31, 2028, the town of Washington shall pay to the department the full 21amount awarded under sub. (1).SB816,3,222(3) If the town of Washington completes the project under sub. (1) and the 23actual costs incurred are less than the amount awarded under sub. (1), the town of 1Washington shall pay to the department any unexpended amount of the amount 2awarded under sub. (1).SB816,3,33